Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-806 Allowance of claims.
(a) As to claims presented in the manner described in section 560:3-804 within
the time limit prescribed in section 560:3-803, the personal representative may
mail a notice to any claimant stating that the claim has been disallowed. If,
after allowing or disallowing a claim, the personal representative changes the
decision concerning the claim, the personal representative shall notify the
claimant. The personal representative may not change a disallowance of a claim
after the time for the claimant to file a petition for allowance or to commence
a proceeding on the claim has run and the claim has been barred. Every claim
which is disallowed in whole or in part by the personal representative is
barred so far as not allowed unless the claimant files a petition for allowance
in the court or commences a proceeding against the personal representative not
later than sixty days after the mailing of the notice of disallowance or
partial allowance if the notice warns the claimant of the impending bar. If
the notice does not warn the claimant of the impending sixty-day bar, then the
claim shall be barred if no petition for allowance or other proceeding on the
claim has been brought within eighteen months of the date of the decedent’s
death. Failure of the personal representative to mail notice to a claimant of
action on the claimant's claim for sixty days after the time for original
presentation of the claim has expired has the effect of a notice of allowance.

(b) After allowing or disallowing a claim the
personal representative may change the allowance or disallowance as hereafter
provided. The personal representative may prior to payment change the
allowance to a disallowance in whole or in part, but not after allowance by a court
order or judgment or an order directing payment of the claim. The personal
representative shall notify the claimant of the change to disallowance, and the
disallowed claim is then subject to bar as provided in subsection (a). The
personal representative may change a disallowance to an allowance, in whole or
in part, until it is barred under subsection (a); after it is barred, it may be
allowed and paid only if the estate is solvent and all successors whose
interests would be affected consent.

(c) Upon the petition of the personal
representative or of a claimant in a proceeding for the purpose, the court may
allow in whole or in part any claim or claims presented to the personal
representative or filed with the clerk of the court in due time and not barred
by subsection (a). Notice in this proceeding shall be given to the claimant,
the personal representative and those other persons interested in the estate as
the court may direct by order entered at the time the proceeding is commenced.

(d) A judgment in a proceeding in another
court against a personal representative to enforce a claim against a decedent's
estate is an allowance of the claim.

(e) Unless otherwise provided in any judgment
in another court entered against the personal representative, allowed claims
bear interest at the legal rate for the period commencing sixty days after the
time for original presentation of the claim has expired unless based on a
contract making a provision for interest, in which case they bear interest in
accordance with that provision. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 82, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next